Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2503
Incentive payment; amount.

Except as provided in section 39-2504, the incentive payment to the various counties and municipal counties shall be based on the class of license of the county highway superintendent appointed and employed by the county and on the rural population of each county or municipal county, as determined by the most recent federal census, according to the following table:

Rural PopulationClass B LicenseClass A LicensePaymentPaymentNot more than 3,000$4,500.00$9,000.003,001 to 5,000$4,875.00$9,750.005,001 to 10,000$5,250.00$10,500.0010,001 to 20,000$5,625.00$11,250.0020,001 to 30,000$6,000.00$12,000.0030,001 and more$6,375.00$12,750.00

Laws 1969, c. 315, § 3, p. 1134;

Laws 1981, LB 51, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 40;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 16;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 14.